Nevada, session 83, AB411.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 639.2801 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
639.2801 Unless specified to the contrary in writing on the
prescription by the prescribing practitioner, all prescriptions filled
by any practitioner must be dispensed in a container to which is
affixed a label or other device which clearly shows:
1. The date.
2. The name, address and prescription serial number of the
practitioner who filled the prescription.
3. [The] Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
names of the prescribing practitioner and of the person for whom
prescribed. Upon request from the prescribing practitioner, an
affixed label or device for a prescription for mifepristone,
misoprostol or their generic alternatives may include the name of
the prescribing health care practice instead of the name of the
prescribing practitioner.
4. The number of dosage units.
5. The symptom or purpose for which the drug is prescribed, if
included by the practitioner pursuant to NRS 639.2352.
6. Specific directions for use given by the prescribing
practitioner.
7. The expiration date of the effectiveness of the drug or
medicine dispensed, if that information is included on the original
label of the manufacturer of that drug or medicine. If the expiration
date specified by the manufacturer is not less than 1 year after the
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
date of dispensing, the practitioner may use a date that is 1 year after
the date of dispensing as the expiration date.
8. The proprietary or generic name of the drug or medicine as
written by the prescribing practitioner.
9. The strength of the drug or medicine.
 The label must contain the warning:
Caution: Do not use with alcohol or nonprescribed drugs
without consulting the prescribing practitioner.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)